Utah statutes.
20A-11-1101.   Illegal to publish political materials in certain publications under certain conditions.

(1)  It is unlawful for an editor, manager, or other person controlling the publication of any newspaper or other periodical circulating in Utah that is wholly or partially owned by a media owner to print or cause to be printed  any matter that is intended or tends to influence, directly or indirectly, any voting at any primary or election in this state unless the media owner has filed the statement required by Section 20A-11-102.

(2)  Any editor, manager, or other person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

